District of Columbia statutes.
46-405

Illegal marriages entered into in another jurisdiction.

If any marriage declared illegal by the aforegoing sections shall be entered into in another jurisdiction by persons having and retaining their domicile in the District of Columbia, such marriage shall be deemed illegal, and may be decreed to be void in said District in the same manner as if it had been celebrated therein.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1392, ch. 854, § 1287

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-405.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-105.
1973 Ed., § 30-105.